Georgia, session 2025_26, HB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 176 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 48 1509S
PART I
SECTION 1-1.
Title 5 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to appeal and error, is amended
by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 5-6-34, relating to judgments and
rulings deemed directly appealable, as follows:
"(1)(A) As used in this paragraph, the term 'final judgment' shall include an order in a
criminal proceeding with a multiple-count indictment or accusation which results in an
adjudication of fewer than all of the counts in such indictment or accusation, the
remainder of which are ordered dead docketed.
(B) All final judgments, that is to say, where the case is no longer pending in the court
below, except as provided in Code Section 5-6-35;"
SECTION 1-2.
Said title is further amended by adding a new paragraph to subsection (a) of Code Section
5-6-35, relating to cases requiring application for appeal, to read as follows:
"(5.3) Direct appeals from guilty pleas;"
SECTION 1-3.
Said title is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"5-6-39.1.
(a)(1) Notwithstanding the availability of habeas corpus relief under Article 2 of Chapter
14 of Title 9; the time limitations set forth in Code Section 5-5-40; or the time limitations
related to a notice of appeal as set forth in this article, a defendant may move for leave
to file an out-of-time motion for new trial or notice of appeal within 100 days from the
expiration of the time period for the filing of such motion or notice:
(A) With the consent of the state;
H. B. 176 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 48 1509S
(B) By showing excusable neglect;
(C) By showing that the failure to timely file such motion for new trial or notice of
appeal was attributable to the deficient performance of such defendant's counsel; or
(D) For other good cause shown.
(2) The trial court judge shall have jurisdiction to consider such motion for leave to file
an out-of-time motion for new trial or notice of appeal. If the judge grants such motion,
the defendant shall have 30 days to file an out-of-time motion for new trial or notice of
appeal and the judge shall have the discretion to allow an extension of time for filing such
motion or notice as set forth in Code Section 5-6-39.
(3) An indigent defendant shall have the right to the assistance of counsel to seek any
relief offered under this Code section.
(b) In a criminal case, after a judgment of conviction, a defendant whose motion seeking
an out-of-time motion for new trial or notice of appeal or whose granted out-of-time
motion for new trial or notice of appeal was dismissed based upon the Supreme Court's
decision in Cook v. State, 313 Ga. 471 (2022), and its progeny, shall have the right to move
for leave to file an out-of-time motion for new trial or notice of appeal until June 30, 2026,
pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section. Any filing made pursuant to this subsection
shall not be subject to the 100-day time limitation in subsection (a) of this Code section."
PART II
SECTION 2-1.
Said title is further amended by revising subsection (b) of Code Section 5-5-40, relating to
time for motion for new trial generally, as follows:
"(b) The motion may be amended any time on or before the ruling thereon; provided,
however, that in criminal proceedings when the defendant substantially amends his or her
H. B. 176 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 48 1509S
motion for new trial, the state shall be given ten days to respond and present evidence, or,
in the discretion of the court, a longer period of time."
PART III
SECTION 3-1.
Code Section 17-7-93 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to reading of
indictment or accusation, answer of accused to charge, recordation of "guilty" plea and
pronouncement of judgment, withdrawn guilty pleas, and pleas by immigrants, is amended
by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(d) After the entry of a guilty plea which results in a conviction, a person may file a
motion to withdraw such plea within 30 days of the entry of such judgment or within the
term of court in which such plea was entered, whichever is later; provided, however, that
such motion to withdraw shall toll the applicable statute of limitations and statutory
demand for speedy trial from the date of the plea until the resolution of the motion to
withdraw."
PART IV
SECTION 4-1.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4-2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 176 (SUB)
- 4 -